Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.901

Application of chapter.

This chapter shall only apply to rental agreements entered into, automatically extended, or automatically renewed after June 9, 1988. Rental agreements entered into before June 9, 1988, which provide for monthly rental payments but providing no specific termination date shall be subject to this chapter on the first monthly rental payment date next succeeding June 9, 1988.

[ 2008 c 61 s 4; 1988 c 240 s 16.]